Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FUND TRANSFERS; MOORHEAD AREA PUBLIC SCHOOLS.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.79, 123B.80, or 124D.20, subdivision 10, on June 30, 2026, Independent School District No. 152, Moorhead Area Public Schools, may permanently transfer up to $....... from its community education revenue reserve account in the community service fund to its undesignated balance in the general fund. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.595, subdivisions 10, 11, and 12; 123B.79; or 123B.80, on June 30, 2026, Independent School District No. 152, Moorhead Area Public Schools, may permanently transfer up to $....... from its long-term facilities maintenance reserve account in the general fund to its undesignated balance in the general fund. new text end